Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF804.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204B.06, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Requirement to hold office. new text end new text begin As a requirement to hold a county, municipal, or school board office, a candidate must not have been convicted of terroristic threats under section 609.713. new text end